Maine, session 132, LD43.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1805, sub-§1, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2,
is amended to read:
D. The court may revoke probation if, during an any unsuspended portion of the term
of imprisonment:
(1) The individual has contact with a victim with whom the individual has been
ordered not to have contact as a condition of probation;
(1-A) The individual has contact with a victim of another crime with whom the
individual has been ordered not to have contact as a condition of probation attached
to a sentence concurrent with or consecutive to the split sentence;
(1-B) The individual has contact with a victim of another crime with whom the
individual had been ordered not to have contact as a condition of probation attached
to a sentence concurrent with the split sentence or to which the split sentence is
consecutive, but the probation had already been revoked prior to the time of the
contact;
(2) In the case of an individual who has been committed to the Department of
Corrections, the individual has contact with any victim with whom the individual
has been prohibited to have contact by the Department of Corrections; or
(3) In the case of an individual who has been committed to a county or regional
jail, the individual has contact with any victim with whom the individual has been
prohibited to have contact by the county or regional jail.